cs: Typ kabiny: Vícemístná kabina (Crew cab); Prodloužená kabina (Extended cab); Běžná kabina (Regular cab); Jiná
sk-SK: Typ kabíny: Dvojkabína; Predĺžená kabína; Štandardná kabína; Iné
es: Tipo de cabina: Cabina doble; Cabina extendida; Cabina regular; Otro
lt-LT: Kabinos tipas: Dviguba kabina („Crew cab“); Pailginta kabina; Standartinė kabina; Kita
en: Cab type: Crew cab; Extended cab; Regular cab; Other
ko: 캡 유형: 크루 캡; 익스텐디드 캡; 레귤러 캡; 기타
hu: Fülke típusa: Duplakabinos; Nyújtott kabinos; Normál kabinos; Egyéb
fr: Type de cabine: Cabine double; Cabine approfondie; Cabine simple; Autre
el: Τύπος καμπίνας: Διπλοκάμπινο; Μιάμιση καμπίνα; Μονή καμπίνα; Άλλο
th: ประเภทห้องโดยสาร: รถกระบะ 4 ประตู; รถกระบะตอนครึ่ง; รถกระบะตอนเดียว; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип на кабината: Двойна кабина; Удължена кабина; Единична кабина; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta karoserije: Dvostruka kabina; Produžena kabina; Obična kabina; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta taksija: Dvojna kabina; Podaljšana kabina; Enojna kabina; Drugo
de: Fahrerhaustyp: Doppelkabine; Erweiterte Kabine; Einzelkabine; Sonstige
it: Tipo di cabina: Cabina doppia; Cabina estesa; Cabina singola; Altro
tr: Kabin türü: Çift kabin; Uzatılmış kabin; Tek kabin; Diğer
da: Taxatype: Dobbeltkabine; Forlænget kabine; Standardkabine; Andet
vi: Loại cabin: Cabin đôi (Crew cab); Cabin kép (Extended cab); Cabin đơn (Regular cab); Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de cabina: Cabina dupla; Cabina estendida; Cabina simples; Outro
pl: Typ kabiny: Kabina załogowa; Kabina przedłużona; Kabina standardowa; Inne
fi: Ohjaamon tyyppi: Miehistöohjaamo; Jatkettu ohjaamo; Tavallinen ohjaamo; Muu
nb: Kabintype: Dobbeltkabin; Forlenget kabin; Standardkabin; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul cabinei: Cabină dublă (Crew cab); Cabină extinsă; Cabină simplă; Altele
zh-TW: 駕駛艙類型: 雙排座駕駛艙; 加長型駕駛艙; 標準型駕駛艙; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de cabine: Cabine dupla; Cabine estendida; Cabine simples; Outro
nl: Soort cabine: Dubbele cabine; Verlengde cabine; Enkele cabine; Overig
sv: Typ av taxi: Dubbelhytt (crew cab); Förlängd hytt; Enkelhytt (regular cab); Övrigt
ru: Тип кабины: Двойная кабина; Полуторная кабина; Одинарная кабина; Другое
ja: キャブタイプ: クルーキャブ; エクステンドキャブ; レギュラーキャブ; その他
zh-CN: 驾驶室类型: 双排座; 加长排座; 单排座; 其他